Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE H. RESEARCH IN HIGHER EDUCATION

CHAPTER 151. BORDER HEALTH INSTITUTE

Sec. 151.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "institute" means the Border Health Institute, a collaboration or consortium of independent public and private entities.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 151.002. ESTABLISHMENT; PURPOSE. (a) The Border Health Institute is established in the city of El Paso.

(b) The institute shall operate in a manner that facilitates and assists the activities of international, national, regional, or local health-related institutions working in the Texas-Mexico border region.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (S.B. 1526), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 151.003. INSTITUTE MEMBERSHIP. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), the institute is composed of the following institutions:

(1) The University of Texas at El Paso;

(2) Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center at El Paso;

(3) El Paso Community College District;

(4) R. E. Thomason General Hospital;

(5) El Paso City/County Health District;

(6) Department of State Health Services; and

(7) Medical Center of the Americas Foundation.

(b) The governing board of the institute may adopt procedures for:

(1) changing, adding, or removing entities as members of the institute; and

(2) creating developmental or advisory boards for the institute.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (S.B. 1526), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 151.004. ADMINISTRATION. (a) The governing board of the institute is composed of the chief executive officer or president of each entity that is a member of the institute or that officer's or president's designee.

(b) The governing board of the institute is responsible for the operation of the institute. The board shall adopt rules relating to:

(1) the operation and deliberations of the governing board; and

(2) the operation of the institute.

(c) The governing board may employ an executive director of the institute and any other officer or employee necessary for the operation of the institute.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 811, Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (S.B. 1526), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 151.005. FUNDING. (a) In addition to any amount appropriated by the legislature, the institute may apply for and accept funds from the federal government or any other public or private entity. The institute or any member of the institute may also solicit and accept pledges, gifts, and endowments from private sources on the institute's behalf. A pledge, gift, or endowment solicited under this section must be consistent with the purposes of the institute.

(b) The governing board of the institute shall manage and approve disbursements of appropriations, funds, pledges, gifts, and endowments that are the property of the institute.

(c) The governing board of the institute shall manage any capital improvements constructed, owned, or leased by the institute and any real property acquired by the institute.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 151.008. STRATEGIC PLAN. The institute shall develop a long-term strategic plan that includes a statement of the institute's goals and objectives for:

(1) providing health care services to persons living in the border region;

(2) providing health care education to persons living in the border region; and

(3) conducting research into issues affecting public health in the border region, including research related to:

(A) diabetes;

(B) health issues of particular concern to persons of Hispanic descent;

(C) infectious diseases;

(D) emerging infections;

(E) trauma care;

(F) environmental health; and

(G) children's health.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (S.B. 1526), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 151.009. COORDINATING BOARD OVERSIGHT. The institutions subject to the oversight of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board under Chapter 61 and the rules of the coordinating board adopted under Chapter 61 remain subject to that supervision and those rules as those institutions participate in the institute and its activities.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.